Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-715
Construction near airports; notice of hearing; to whom; objections.

The Director of Aeronautics shall notify the owners of and persons operating upon any licensed airport affected by any application filed pursuant to section 75-713 and in the notice shall state the time and place of the hearing. The director may appear at the hearing and make objections to the granting of permission for the construction of any overhead wires, cable, or pipelines when, in his or her opinion, the construction would result in danger to the life, limb, or property of any person carried by and operating aircraft in the vicinity of the licensed airport.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 15, p. 1426;

Laws 1980, LB 611, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 126.

A party is precluded from objecting to the order of the Public Service Commission if he fails to act in accordance with the time limits prescribed in the statutes governing the procedure to obtain a reversal, modification, or vacation of the order. Nebraska Public Power Dist. v. Huebner, 202 Neb. 587, 276 N.W.2d 228 (1979).

An order of the Public Service Commission granting authority to the public power district to construct a transmission line becomes final thirty days after the mailing of a copy of the order, and it may not be revoked after that time. Nebraska Public Power Dist. v. Huebner, 202 Neb. 587, 276 N.W.2d 228 (1979).